trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="NC_IZE">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC00000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aire-poltsa</l> 
        <r>air_bag</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>astalar</l> 
        <r>ardo_de_cardadores</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>delirium_tremens</l> 
        <r>delirium_tremens</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tasmaniako_deabru</l> 
        <r>diablo_de_tasmania</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>saltxitxa-ogitarteko</l> 
        <r>hot_dog</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mezzo-piano</l> 
        <r>mezzo_piano</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mosso_d'esquadra</l> 
        <r>mosso_d'esquadra</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>numerus_clausus</l> 
        <r>numerus_clausus</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>osso-buco</l> 
        <r>osso_buco</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>porta</l> 
        <r>portaobjeto_s</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rock-and-roll</l> 
        <r>rock_and_roll</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tai_ji</l> 
        <r>tai_chi</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tuttifrutti</l> 
        <r>tutti_frutti</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE"/> 
    </e>
